Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is  appropriated to the Department of Justice, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $15,006,603 for the payment of
expenses of district attorneys.
SECTION 2.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 7, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 10, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 1